Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2898.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 151.01, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 44. new text end new text begin Over-the-counter drug. new text end new text begin "Over-the-counter drug" means a drug legally available by retail sale that does not require a prescription or consultation with a pharmacist or other health care professional. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [151.411] OVER-THE-COUNTER SALE OF IVERMECTIN AND HYDROXYCHLORIOQUINE. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a registered pharmacy or a licensed pharmacist must offer ivermectin and hydroxychloroquine tablets suitable for human use for sale as an over-the-counter drug. new text end